Hawaii statutes.
TITLE 16.
INTOXICATING LIQUOR

Chapter

281 Intoxicating Liquor

CHAPTER
281

INTOXICATING
LIQUOR

Part I. General Provisions

Section

281-1 Definitions

281-2 Excepted articles; penalty

281-3 Illegal manufacture, importation, or sale
of liquor

281-4 Liquor consumption on unlicensed premises

prohibited, when

281-5 Powdered alcohol

Part II. Liquor Commissions

281-11 County liquor commissions and liquor
control

adjudication boards; qualifications;
compensation

281-11.5 Liquor commission and board attorney

281-12 Commission and board office

281-13 Meetings

281-14 Records

281-15 Reports, accounts, audit

281-16 County liquor commission and liquor
control

adjudication board funds; disposition of
realization;

payment of expenses

281-17 Jurisdiction and powers

281-17.5 Fees; justified, method of change,
limitation

281-18 Repealed

281-19 Hearings, attendance, examinations

281-20 General right of inspection

281-21 Service of subpoenas by investigators,
police officers,

or other law enforcement officers;
witnesses' fees

281-22 Political activities of commission
employees

Part III. Licenses and Permits, General
Provisions

281-31 Licenses, classes

281-32 Licenses, temporary

281-32.3 Repealed

281-32.5 Permits for trade shows or other
exhibitions

281-33 Special powers, privileges, and rights

281-33.1 Individual permits to receive shipments of
liquor

281-33.5 Repealed

281-33.6 Direct shipment of wine by wineries

281-34 Sham operation under club license;
supervision

281-35 Special conditions; club licenses

281-35.5 Special conditions; condominium hotel
licenses

281-36 Repealed

281-37 Sales of alcohol

281-38 Conditions of licenses

281-39 Place of business; exception; solicitors'
and

representatives' permits

281-39.5 Liquor license prohibited; where

281-40 Unlicensed liquor

281-41 Transfer of licenses; notice of change in
officers,

directors, and stockholders of corporate
licenses,

partners of a partnership license, and
members of a

limited liability company license; penalty

281-42 Manufacturers and wholesale dealers,
special

restrictions

281-43 Repealed

281-44 Advertisements and signs upon licensed
premises

281-45 No license issued, when

281-46 Pool buying

281-47 Standard bar; music and dancing available

Part IV. Procedure for Obtaining License

281-51 Prior inspection

281-52 Public hearing

281-53 Application; penalty for false statements

281-53.5 County liquor commissions; criminal
history record

check

281-54 Filing fees with application

281-55 Reference to investigator

281-56 Report by investigator

281-57 Preliminary hearing; notice of public
hearing

281-58 Protests

281-59 Hearing; rehearing

281-60 Further application

281-61 Renewals

281-62 Reduction or increase in area of licensed
premises

Part V. Duties of and Supervision over
Licensee

281-71 Posting of license

281-72 Condition of premises

281-73 Quality of liquor; penalty

281-74 Labels on containers

281-75 Analyses

281-76 Tampering with samples; penalty

281-77 Refusal of samples; penalty

281-78 Prohibitions

281-78.5 Practices to promote excessive consumption
of liquor;

prohibited

281-79 Entry for examination; obstructing liquor
commission

operations; penalty

281-80 Arrest

281-81 Repealed

281-82 No action for debt

281-83 Repealed

281-84 Exclusion of intoxicated person from
premises; penalty

281-85 Prize, gift, premium, and other inducement

Part VI. Revocation of License

281-91 Revocation or suspension of license;
hearing

281-92 Appeals

281-93 Reports to prosecuting officers

281-94 Forfeiture of fee paid

281-95 Bankruptcy, insolvency, death

281-96 Cancellation

281-97 When sale without license authorized

Part VII. General Violations and
Prosecutions

281-101 Manufacture or sale without license;
penalty

281-101.4 Hearing, illegal manufacture, importation,
or sale of

liquor

281-101.5 Prohibitions involving minors; penalty

281-102 Other offenses; penalty

281-102.5 Purchasing from other than primary source
of supply;

penalty

281-103 Repealed

281-104 Investigators, employees, counsel for

281-105 Determination whether acts were in scope
of duty

281-106 Prosecutions not to exclude other remedies
affecting

license or goods

281-107 Presumptive evidence

281-108 Search warrants; seizure

281-109 Seizure without warrant

281-110 Arrest; abetters

281-111 Condemnation of property or liquor;
disposition

281-112 Repealed

281-113 Claims

281-114 Appeals

Part VIII. Price Discrimination in
Supplying Liquor--

Repealed

281-121 to 124 Repealed

Note

Under Article VIII, Section 2, of the State Constitution,
charter provisions relating to a county's executive, legislative and
administrative structure and organization are superior to statutory
provisions. And under HRS §50-10, charter provisions supersede all laws
affecting the organization and government of the county which are in conflict
therewith. Accordingly, the charters should be consulted to determine whether
any of the provisions set out in this chapter have been superseded in whole or
in part.

Cross References

National Human Trafficking Resource Center hotline; posting
requirement; penalty, see §371-20.

Case Notes

Liquor commission may adopt administrative rules to prevent
racial discrimination. 69 H. 238, 738 P.2d 1205.

Defendants' motion to dismiss complaint granted insofar as it
asserted claims against the liquor commission; the commission lacked the
capacity to be sued. 681 F. Supp. 2d 1209 (2009).

Plaintiff must exhaust its administrative remedy in the
circuit court before it may pursue its state law claims, as required by
§281-17; thus, defendants' motion to dismiss plaintiff's state law claims
under the state constitution, this chapter, and the liquor commission rules,
granted. 681 F. Supp. 2d 1209 (2009).

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next